Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Service Creditable Toward Retirement Benefits

47-3-80.
Power of the board of trustees to determine which service is creditable service.

The board of trustees shall fix and determine by appropriate rules and regulations how much service in any year is equivalent to one year of creditable service, but in no case shall more than one year of service be creditable for all service in one calendar year. Service rendered for a regular school year shall be equivalent to one year of creditable service.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 4.

47-3-81.
Transfer of service credits from Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia; limitations; additional contributions or adjustments required.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, any member, other than a member subject to subsection (b) of this Code section, who was previously a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and who has service credits with said employees’ retirement system may have such service credits and accumulated contributions under said employees’ retirement system transferred to the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia. Any member who elects to transfer such service credits and accumulated contributions shall notify the board of trustees of this retirement system in writing of the member’s election to do so. Such transferred service credits shall not be used in determining the qualifications of a member for benefits other than vested rights, disability, death, or normal service retirement. Such member shall be required to make additional contributions to this retirement system so that the member’s annuity account balance will be the same as though the member had been a member of this retirement system during the period of time for which service credits are transferred from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia to this retirement system or, in the absence of such payment, the board of trustees shall adjust the member’s credits in proportion to the accumulated contributions transferred from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia to this retirement system. The Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall pay an employer contribution plus regular interest to the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia for each member transferring service credits and accumulated contributions to the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia authorized in this Code section. The amount of such employer contributions shall be 6 percent of the reported compensation of the member while a member of said employees’ retirement system. The employees’ retirement system shall pay an additional amount of retirement contributions pursuant to Code Section 47-2-51 for an employees’ retirement system member covered by Code Section 47-2-334. This payment shall be placed in the pension accumulation fund and will adjust the amount of employee retirement contributions required for service credit.

Any provision of this title to the contrary notwithstanding, any vested member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia who becomes a teacher may, at his or her option, elect to remain a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

If a person subject to this subsection elects to remain a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the employer and teacher shall make all contributions to such retirement system and perform such other acts as are required by law or regulation.

If a person subject to this subsection does not elect to remain a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, he or she shall become a member of this retirement system subject to all provisions of this chapter.

This subsection shall be applicable to each person who was a member of this retirement system on January 1, 1997, and to all persons who become a member on or after such date. Any person subject to this subsection who became a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia between January 1, 1997, and June 30, 1998, who elects to remain a member of this retirement system shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section relating to the transfer of service credits and accumulated contributions.

Any person eligible to make the election provided for in this subsection shall do so in writing to the board of trustees not later than September 30, 2000, or within 60 days after the person became a teacher, whichever date is later. Once made, the election shall be irrevocable.

The provisions of this subsection shall not become a part of the employment contract and shall be subject to subsequent legislation; provided, however, that no person who has made the election provided by this subsection shall be affected by any subsequent legislation.

At the time the membership of a person subject to Article 10 of Chapter 2 of this title is transferred from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia to this retirement system, this retirement system shall receive the funds transferred from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia pursuant to Code Section 47-2-181 and, as applicable, add the accrued benefit transferred from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia to the accrued benefit or the balance of employee contributions and interest. The total benefits of any such member shall be subject to the rules of this retirement system.

At the time the membership of a member of this retirement system transfers to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and is subject to Article 10 of Chapter 2 of this title, this retirement system shall:

Calculate the accumulated benefit using the service and compensation at the time of the transfer;

Calculate the present value of the accrued benefit using methods and assumptions adopted by the board of trustees; and

Transfer to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia the greater of the present value of the accumulated benefit or the balance of the employee contributions and interest.

All service transferred pursuant to this subsection shall be calculated as credit in this retirement system for all purposes in this retirement system.

This retirement system and the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall recalculate the accumulated benefit of any person transferred between such retirement systems from January 1, 2009, through June 30, 2012, according to the methods prescribed by this subsection.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 16; Ga. L. 1966, p. 513, § 4; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1405, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1543, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1105, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 775, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1273, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1051, § 4/SB 286.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added subsection (c).

47-3-82.
Reestablishment of creditable service by persons who have withdrawn their contributions.

Subject to the additional requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, a member who has withdrawn accumulated contributions from the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 47-3-128 may reestablish the creditable service represented by the withdrawn contributions by paying to the board of trustees a sum equal to the amount of accumulated contributions which were withdrawn plus applicable accrued regular interest for each year or portion thereof which elapsed from the time of such withdrawal of contributions to the date of such payment.

A member must complete a minimum number of years of service as a contributing member of the retirement system before becoming eligible to reestablish creditable service under subsection (a) of this Code section as follows:

When accumulated contributions have been withdrawn not more than three times, the minimum shall be three years;

When accumulated contributions have been withdrawn not more than four times, the minimum shall be five years; and

When accumulated contributions have been withdrawn five or more times, the minimum shall be ten years.

The regular interest rate provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be increased 2 percent for each withdrawal of accumulated contributions exceeding three such withdrawals.

A member may establish a portion of the creditable service represented by all of the member’s withdrawn contributions by paying to the board of trustees a pro rata amount based upon the total accumulated contributions withdrawn plus interest in accordance with rules adopted by the board of trustees and subject to the provisions of subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 828, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 346, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 529, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1347, § 1.

47-3-83.
Service credit for active duty service in the armed forces of the United States; limitations on credit for such service if used to obtain other state or federal retirement benefits.

Any person who was on active duty in the armed forces of the United States during World War I, World War II, the Korean War, or any period of national emergency may receive up to five years of service credit for such military service under the following conditions:

Prior service credit shall be awarded at no cost to the member for any period of military service prior to January 1, 1945;

Membership service credit shall be awarded for any period of active military service performed after January 1, 1945, upon payment by the member of the regular employee contribution of:

Five percent on the earnable compensation last paid to him as a teacher before entering military service or if he was not a teacher prior to entering military service 5 percent on the earnable compensation first paid to him as a teacher after returning from military service, whichever the case may be, plus applicable accrued regular interest on such employee contributions, compounded annually to date of payment, for any period of active military service between January 1, 1945, and July 1, 1961; and

Six percent on the earnable compensation last paid to him as a teacher before entering military service or if he was not a teacher prior to entering military service 6 percent on the earnable compensation first paid to him as a teacher after returning from military service, whichever the case may be, plus applicable accrued regular interest on such employee contributions, compounded annually to date of payment, for any period of active military service subsequent to July 1, 1961.

Any member who on July 1, 1978, has 20 or more years of membership service and who was on active duty in the armed forces of the United States during the period beginning on July 1, 1946, and ending on December 31, 1948, may receive military service credit for such period of time, provided that such member shall pay the regular employee and employer contributions which would have been paid on the compensation first paid to him as a teacher following the completion of such military service during such period, plus applicable accrued regular interest on such employee and employer contributions, compounded annually to date of payment; provided, further, that no such member shall receive more than five years of service credit for all military service; provided, further, that no member shall claim service credit under this subsection for military service during such period for which credit has previously been received.

No active military service in the armed forces of the United States shall be deemed as creditable under the retirement system if such service has or will be used in the determination of any member’s eligibility for retirement benefits or allowances from any other state or federal retirement program, excluding social security and the United States civil service system.

In addition to creditable service authorized by subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, but subject to the limitations of subsection (c) of this Code section, a member who was on active duty in the armed forces of the United States during any period when a military draft was in effect and who was honorably discharged from military service may receive credit for such military service under the following conditions:

The total amount of creditable service for military service which may be received under all provisions of this Code section may not exceed five years;

The member shall pay to the board of trustees the regular employee and employer contributions which would have been paid during the period for which creditable service is claimed based on the compensation of the member upon first becoming a teacher after the completion of the military service plus applicable accrued regular interest on such employee and employer contributions compounded annually to date of payment; and

No creditable service for military service may be obtained pursuant to the authority of this subsection if creditable service for the same military service has been or may be obtained under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, an employer contribution shall be made to the account of any member who is required to perform “ordered military duty” in the armed forces as defined in Code Section 38-2-279. The contribution shall be made by the employer for the period during which the member served in the armed forces of the United States and in the same account as would have been contributed by the employer had the member remained in employment under the retirement system without change in compensation during that period. For the purposes of this subsection, the word “employer” means the State of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 14; Ga. L. 1965, p. 438, § 3; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1198, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 825, § 4; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1685, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1552, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 996, § 1.

Cross references.

Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable, §

47-1-11

.

47-3-84.
Credit for service rendered by members who have breaks in membership; payments required to obtain such credit.

Any provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any teacher shall be entitled to have all teaching service included in computing creditable service, notwithstanding breaks in membership of more than four years, provided that such teacher pays into the retirement system an amount equal to the minimum required for continuous members, plus regular interest that would have accrued on such contributions during periods of nonmembership. No member shall receive credit for teaching service if contributions were not made during the teaching service or have not later been contributed with interest that would have accrued on such contributions, provided that after three years’ membership service a member may reestablish previous credits by paying into the retirement system, prior to retirement, contributions equal to 10 percent of such compensation as he received during those years and for which he desires to establish previous credit, plus regular interest that would have accrued on such contributions.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 462, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 319, § 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 564, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 414, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1007, § 2.

47-3-84.1.
Certain former members of the system who have not withdrawn contributions.

Any former member of the retirement system who is not a beneficiary of the retirement system on July 1, 1986, who completed at least ten consecutive years of membership service during a period beginning not earlier than January 1, 1954, and ending not later than January 1, 1966, who has not withdrawn from the retirement system employee contributions which were made during such consecutive years of membership service, and who is at least 60 years of age as of July 1, 1986, shall have the right to:

Obtain credit for service rendered at any time prior to January 1, 1954, as a teacher in Georgia public school systems upon providing verification of such teaching service to the board of trustees and upon paying to the board of trustees employee and employer contributions plus applicable accrued regular interest for such prior teaching service based on compensation actually received for such prior teaching service;

Obtain credit for up to five years of service rendered at any time prior to January 1, 1945, for teaching in public school systems of other states upon providing verification of such out-of-state teaching service to the board of trustees and upon paying to the board of trustees employee and employer contributions plus applicable accrued regular interest for such service based on compensation actually received for such out-of-state teaching service, provided such former member is not entitled to receive any pension or annuity from any other state or from any political subdivision of this or any other state based on such service; and

Apply to the board of trustees at any time between July 1, 1986, and January 1, 1987, to obtain any portion or all eligible creditable service provided for by paragraph (1) or (2) or paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection and to receive a retirement benefit based on the combined total of creditable service so obtained plus the years of membership service for which employee contributions have not been withdrawn; or

Apply to the board of trustees at any time between July 1, 1986, and January 1, 1987, to reestablish active membership in the retirement system only for the purpose of retiring on the basis of membership service for which employee contributions have not been withdrawn without the necessity of the payment of any additional employee contributions.

The board of trustees shall begin making retirement benefit payments to a former member of the retirement system who qualifies therefor pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section on the first day of the month within 30 days after such former member so qualifies.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-84.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1531, § 1.

47-3-84.2.
[Repealed] Credit for service by members described in subparagraphs (N) and (P) of paragraph (28) of Code Section 47-3-1.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-84.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 685, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2013, p. 862, § 2/HB 345, effective July 1, 2013.

47-3-85.
Credit for service by former member of Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia who withdrew contributions; credit for service before that retirement system established.

Subject to the additional requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, any current member who was previously a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia and who withdrew employee contributions from that system may reestablish the creditable service represented by the withdrawn contributions by paying to the board of trustees the minimum employee contributions required for continuous members of this retirement system, plus regular interest that would have accrued on such amount from the date that contributions to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia stopped being credited with interest. Upon receipt of notice from the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia that a member has repaid to it contributions previously withdrawn from the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall pay an employer contribution plus regular interest to the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia. The amount of such employer contributions shall be 6 percent of the reported compensation of the member while a member of said employees’ retirement system. The employees’ retirement system shall pay an additional amount of retirement contributions pursuant to Code Section 47-2-51 for an employees’ retirement system member covered by Code Section 47-2-334. This payment shall be placed in the pension accumulation fund and will adjust the amount of employee retirement contributions required for service credit.

A member must complete a minimum number of years of service as a contributing member of the retirement system before becoming eligible to reestablish creditable service under subsection (a) of this Code section as follows:

When accumulated contributions have been withdrawn not more than three times, the minimum shall be three years;

When accumulated contributions have been withdrawn not more than four times, the minimum shall be five years; and

When accumulated contributions have been withdrawn five or more times, the minimum shall be ten years.

The regular interest rate provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be increased 2 percent for each withdrawal of accumulated contributions exceeding three such withdrawals.

A member may establish a portion of the creditable service represented by all of the member’s withdrawn contributions by paying to the board of trustees a pro rata amount based upon the total accumulated contributions withdrawn plus interest in accordance with rules adopted by the board of trustees and subject to the provisions of subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this Code section.

Any current member who previously rendered service which would currently be covered by the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, but which was rendered prior to the establishment of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, may obtain credit for such service, provided that he renders at least five years of service as a contributing member of this retirement system; provided, further, that for all such service on and after January 1, 1945, such member pays into this retirement system the employee and employer contributions which would have been paid into this retirement system had he rendered such service as a member of this retirement system, plus the applicable rate of interest in accordance with regulations adopted by the board of trustees.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1405, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1574, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1637, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 930, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1007, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1258, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1105, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 723, § 1.

47-3-86.
Issuance of a prior service certificate; evidentiary effect of such certificate; credit for prior service rendered by members who previously elected nonmembership.

Under such rules and regulations as the board of trustees shall adopt, each member who (1) was a teacher at any time during the calendar year 1943, or (2) has taught for at least two years between January 1, 1940, and January 1, 1943, or at least two years from January 1, 1945, to January 1, 1948, or (3) has taught at least one year between January 1, 1945, and January 1, 1948, and has 15 years of service previous to January 1, 1948, shall file a detailed statement of all services rendered by him as a teacher prior to January 1, 1945, for which he claims credit. If any person who would otherwise have qualified under this subsection is on leave in the armed forces of the United States, he shall have until six months after termination of his military service to file a statement of such services.

Upon verification of such statement of service, the board of trustees shall issue to each such member a prior service certificate certifying to the service prior to January 1, 1945, with which he is credited on the basis of his statement of service and the amount of his prior service accumulations. So long as membership continues, a prior service certificate shall be final and conclusive evidence of such service for retirement purposes, provided that a member may request the board of trustees to modify or correct his prior service certificate within one year of the date of issuance or any previous modification or correction. When membership ceases, such prior service certificate shall become void.

Any member who is unable to qualify for prior service under subsection (a) of this Code section may qualify for prior service he has rendered in the public schools or University System of Georgia after he has been a contributing member for five years and upon compliance with other requirements of this chapter.

Any teacher who previously elected not to become a member and signed a nonmembership card to that effect, but who desires to become a member, may receive credit for prior service upon making a contribution equal to 5 percent of all earnable compensation between January 1, 1945, and July 1, 1961, and 6 percent of all earnable compensation after July 1, 1961, plus accrued regular interest on such amounts compounded annually to the date on which the contribution is paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 4; Ga. L. 1947, p. 872, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 390, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1116, § 2; Ga. L. 1961, p. 388, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 12; Ga. L. 1963, p. 542, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 438, § 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 825, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47.

47-3-87.
[Reserved] Accumulated contributions for prior service; local retirement fund service included; determination of earnable compensation received during prior service.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 46, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 4; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 13.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-3-87.1.
Credit for service rendered in independent school system prior to, but not later than, June 30, 1979.

As used in this Code section, the terms “independent school system” and “local retirement fund” shall have the same meaning as defined by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 47-3-66.

Any active member who was employed by an independent school system prior to, but not later than, June 30, 1979, and who was, while so employed, a member of a local retirement fund of such independent school system and had a vested right to benefits thereunder and who has not withdrawn employee contributions from the local retirement system shall receive creditable service under this chapter equivalent to the creditable service the member had under said local retirement fund subject to the following conditions:

The fiscal authority or other governing body, by whatever name designated, of the local retirement fund of the independent school system shall pay to the board of trustees the total amount of employee contributions credited to the member under the local retirement fund plus applicable accrued regular interest, as determined by the board of trustees, which would have accumulated on such contributions. Such payment must be paid to the board of trustees, in a manner prescribed by the board, by not later than January 1, 1983, or by the date of retirement, if the member retires prior to January 1, 1983;

The member shall pay to the board of trustees the amount of contributions which would have been paid by the member to the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia if the member had been a member of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia for the period of creditable service the member had under the local retirement fund plus applicable accrued regular interest, as determined by the board of trustees, which would have accumulated on such contributions, but the amount otherwise payable hereunder shall be reduced by the amount paid to the board of trustees under paragraph (1) of this subsection. Such payment must be made to the board of trustees, in a manner prescribed by the board, by not later than January 1, 1983, or by the date of retirement if the member retires prior to January 1, 1983. Creditable service under this subsection shall not be granted to the member until the payment required by this paragraph has been made to the board of trustees;

The fiscal authority or other governing body, by whatever name designated, of the local retirement fund of the independent school system shall pay to the board of trustees the amount of employer contributions for such creditable service, which would have been paid to the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia had the teacher been a member of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia at the time the service was rendered, plus applicable accrued regular interest thereon, as determined by the board of trustees;

No creditable service under this subsection may be obtained for creditable service under a local retirement fund unless the member has forfeited any right to receive a retirement benefit under the local retirement fund;

No creditable service under this subsection may be obtained if such creditable service would not be allowable under other provisions of this chapter; and

Subsections (i), (j), and (k) of Code Section 47-3-66 shall apply to payments required by this subsection.

Any active member who was employed by an independent school system prior to, but not later than, June 30, 1979, and who was, while so employed, a member of a local retirement fund of such independent school system and had no vested right to benefits thereunder and who has withdrawn employee contributions from the local retirement fund and who had 17 years or more of creditable service with that local retirement fund shall receive creditable service under this chapter equivalent to the creditable service the member had under said local retirement fund upon the payment by the member to the board of trustees of the amount of contributions which would have been paid by the member to the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia if the member had been a member of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia for the period of creditable service the member had under the local retirement fund, plus applicable accrued regular interest, as determined by the board of trustees, which would have accumulated on such contributions. Such payment must be paid to the board of trustees in a manner prescribed by the board by not later than January 1, 1983, or by the date of retirement if the member retires prior to January 1, 1983. Creditable service under this subsection shall not be granted until the payment required by this subsection has been made to the board of trustees. Paragraphs (4) and (5) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall apply to creditable service obtained under this subsection.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 1192, § 1; Code 1981, §

47-3-87.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1192, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

47-3-88.
Credit for service rendered to a local school system by persons who became members on or after April 1, 1966; payments required in order to obtain such credit.

Any other provision of this or any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, in order for a teacher who becomes a member of the retirement system on or after April 1, 1966, to receive full creditable service for service rendered while a member of a local school system and before he became a member of the retirement system either such teacher, or the local board of education for which such service was rendered, or the local board of education by which the member is currently employed must pay the employee and employer contributions, plus regular interest. The board of trustees shall determine the amount to be paid, provided that in no case shall a member pay more than the total member and employer contributions and regular interest in effect at the time such service was rendered.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 1637, § 1.

47-3-89.
Credit for service rendered in governmentally supported or operated schools other than public schools in Georgia; payments required to obtain credit for such service.

Any member of the retirement system shall be entitled to receive up to ten years of creditable service for teaching service in school systems of other states in the United States, state supported independent school systems of the United States, schools operated by the Bureau of Indian Affairs of the United States Department of the Interior, public school systems of the Virgin Islands, Puerto Rico, Guam, and the District of Columbia, or American dependents’ schools, provided that the member has first established five years of membership service credit in the public schools of Georgia or the University System of Georgia; provided, further, that such service credit shall be allowed on the basis of one year of credit for such service for each additional year of membership service in the public schools of Georgia or the University System of Georgia. A teacher desiring to establish credit for such service must pay employee and employer contributions which would have been paid to the retirement system on a salary comparable to his salary for such service, plus the applicable rate of interest, in accordance with regulations adopted by the board of trustees. Such contributions must be paid prior to retirement under this retirement system. For such service rendered prior to January 1, 1945, the rate of employee contributions shall be 5 percent and the rate of employer contributions shall be 6.83 percent. The rate of interest on such contributions shall be the applicable regular interest. No member who receives or who is entitled to receive a pension or annuity from any other state, county, or municipality, or federal retirement program excluding social security, shall receive creditable service for such service. The board of trustees shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this Code section.

Any provisions of this Code section to the contrary notwithstanding, teachers who became members of the retirement system prior to April 1, 1966, shall be permitted to establish credit for a maximum of ten years of service in school systems of other states in the United States that permit retirement credit for teaching service rendered in Georgia public schools, by paying 8 percent of such out-of-state compensation that they received, plus applicable accumulated interest, in accordance with regulations adopted by the board of trustees. Such members may establish credit for one year of out-of-state service for each year of membership service in the public schools of Georgia or the University System of Georgia rendered after the first five years of membership service.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 508, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 1116, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 562, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 582, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 627, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 909, § 3; Ga. L. 1977, p. 825, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1095, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 998, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

47-3-90.
Absence from employment because of pregnancy.

A member who, prior to March 5, 1976, was employed by a public school system of this state in a capacity specified by subsection (a) of Code Section 20-2-850 may, subject to the limitations of subsection (b) and the requirements of subsection (c) of this Code section, obtain creditable service under the retirement system for any period prior to March 5, 1976, during which the member was absent from employment because of pregnancy.

No creditable service shall be granted for any part of a period of absence from employment because of pregnancy when the member was on sick leave. The maximum amount of creditable service which may be obtained by a member for any one pregnancy shall be one and one-half months and the maximum amount of creditable service which may be obtained by a member for all pregnancies shall be six months.

A member who desires to establish creditable service under this Code section must:

Submit to the board satisfactory evidence of the period of absence from employment which qualifies for creditable service under this Code section; and

Pay to the board an amount determined by the board to be sufficient to cover the full actuarial cost of granting the creditable service claimed by the member.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1536, § 1; Ga. L 1988, p. 697, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1796, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1610, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 726, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 366, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 697, § 1, which would have amended paragraph (c)(2) of this Code section, was not concurrently funded as required by Code Section 47-20-50 and, therefore, did not become law and was repealed on July 1, 1988. See the state auditor’s report at Ga. L. 1988, p. CCLXXXIV. This Act was subsequently repealed by Ga. L. 1989, p. 251, § 1, effective March 30, 1989.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1796, § 1, which would have amended subsection (a) and paragraph (c)(2) of this Code section, was not concurrently funded as required by Code Section 47-20-50 and, therefore, did not become law and was repealed on July 1, 1990. See the state auditor’s report at Ga. L. 1990, p. CCCV.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 1610, § 1, which would have amended subsections (a) and (c) of this Code section, was not concurrently funded as required by Code Section 47-20-50 and, therefore, did not become law and was repealed on July 1, 1992. See the state auditor’s report at Ga. L. 1992, p. CDV.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 726, § 1, which would have amended subsections (a) and (c) of this Code section, was not concurrently funded as required by Code Section 47-20-50 and, therefore, did not become law and was repealed on July 1, 1994. See the state auditor’s report at Ga. L. 1994, p. CCCLXXIX.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 366, § 1, which would have amended subsections (a) and (c) of this Code section, was not concurrently funded as required by Code Section 47-20-50 and, therefore, did not become law and was repealed on July 1, 1996. See the state auditor’s report at Ga. L. 1996, p. CCCLI.